Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 2 Public Employee Retirement Plans Generally
Subchapter 5
— Military Service Credit

Effective Dates.

Acts 1987, No. 92, § 4: Feb. 27, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly that the law on free military service credit is unclear, that a clarification of Act 634 of 1973 is needed and therefore an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 218, § 4: Mar. 13, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly that the law on free military service credit is unclear, that a clarification of Act 634 of 1973 is needed and therefore an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 28: July 1, 1998.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 177, § 15: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this bill affects the structure of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System and the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the ideal time to make revisions to the retirement systems is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 295, § 4: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that many of the citizens of the State of Arkansas are serving our country as active duty military and in the Arkansas National Guard and Armed Forces Reserve; that they should not be penalized for their service to their country; and that current retirement law does not fully provide for our servicemen and servicewomen as provided for in federal law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) the date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 11: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 69, § 22: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that a member's purchase of service credit currently provides that a member pay the system yesterday's dollars for the value of today's benefits; that such a valuation is unfair to the members as a whole and inconsistent with the prudent management of the system's funds and obligations; that the purchase of service credit in the system should be based upon actuarial equivalents; that the purchase of service credit should be paid in a lump sum to the system; that current service purchase accounts remain unpaid and inactive for many years at a time and create an administrative burden and accounting difficulty on the system that can be remedied by the passage of this act; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

24-2-501. Free credited service.

Any member of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System established by § 24-8-201 et seq. shall be entitled to receive free credited service in the system for a period of not to exceed two (2) years for service rendered by him or her in the United States Armed Forces during World War I, World War II, the Korean Conflict, or the Vietnam Conflict.

Notwithstanding § 24-2-502 or any other law to the contrary, any member of the system may also purchase credited service in the system not to exceed five (5) years for service rendered by him or her in the United States Armed Forces and to be purchased in accordance with the procedures in § 24-2-502.

Any person entitled to receive free credited service in the system under the provisions of this section shall be granted credited service under the system for service in the armed forces during World War I, World War II, the Korean Conflict, or the Vietnam Conflict upon:

Making application therefor to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System; and

Providing proof satisfactory to the board of that person's military service.

The provisions of this section shall be supplemental to any other laws relating to state-supported retirement systems in this state. Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the right of any member of a state-supported retirement system to obtain credited service in the system for military service.

This section shall not apply to the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System provided for in § 24-8-701 et seq.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 634, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2524.1 — 12-2524.3; Acts 1987, No. 92, §§ 1, 2; 1987, No. 218, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 1185, § 1; 1999, No. 399, § 2.

24-2-502. Purchased credited service.

Any person who is or was a member of a state-supported retirement system in this state and who was not receiving benefits under the system on July 9, 1975, shall be entitled to purchase credited service in the system for a period not to exceed five (5) years for service rendered by the member in the United States Armed Forces prior to the member's employment in a position covered by a state-supported retirement system, but only if the person:

Has five (5) years of actual service with the retirement system;

Received an honorable discharge from the armed forces; and

For the first three (3) years of credited service, contributes to the members' deposit account a sum of money equal to the amount he or she would have contributed to the account had he or she been a member during his or her term of military service. This amount shall be based upon his or her monthly contributions at the time he or she first became a member of the retirement system and interest thereon at the rate of six percent (6%), together with an amount equal to the employer's matching contribution and interest thereon at the rate of six percent (6%), which interest shall commence January 1, 1976, or six (6) months after eligibility, whichever is later.

For the fourth and fifth year of credited service, contributes to the members' deposit account a sum of money equal to the amount he or she would have contributed to the account had he or she been a member during his or her term of military service. This amount shall be based upon:

His or her salary at the time he or she first became a member of the retirement system;

The employer's contribution in effect at the time he or she first became eligible to purchase the military service; and

Interest thereon on both the employee's and employer's contributions at the rate of six percent (6%), which interest shall commence January 1, 1976, or six (6) months after eligibility, whichever is later.

The benefit program to be applicable to the credited service for members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the State Police Retirement System, or the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be:

The benefit program of § 24-4-101 et seq. for members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

The benefit program based on § 24-6-101 et seq. for members of the State Police Retirement System; or

The benefit program based on § 24-7-101 et seq. for members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The provisions of this section shall be supplemental to any other laws relating to state-supported retirement systems in this state. Nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal or modify any existing provisions of any state-supported retirement system law providing for credited service in the system for military service, nor to diminish the right of any member of a state-supported retirement system to obtain credited service in the system for military service under the provisions of existing laws, but in no event shall any member of a state-supported retirement system be entitled to or receive in excess of five (5) years of credited service for military service rendered by the member. No member shall be eligible for credited military service in more than one (1) state-supported retirement system.

When the applicant can obtain military service credit under this section and also under other laws relating to state-supported retirement systems in this state, then service credit shall be granted under the provisions of the laws in chronological order beginning with the earliest law. However, the laws may not be used to allow duplicate service credit.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 573, §§ 1-3; 1985, No. 938, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2524.4 — 12-2524.6; Acts 1993, No. 1098, § 1; 1995, No. 611, § 1; 1997, No. 1053, § 26; 2001, No. 151, § 7; 2009, No. 295, § 1; 2011, No. 69, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (a)(3), redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly, and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment inserted “or the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” in the introductory language of (b); and added (b)(3).

24-2-503. Arkansas National Guard and armed forces reserve service credit.

As used in this section, “armed forces reserve” means one (1) of the reserve components of the United States Armed Forces.

A member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System may purchase credited service in the system for a period not to exceed five (5) years for compensated service rendered by the member in the Arkansas National Guard or in the armed forces reserve if the member:

Makes an application to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

Provides the board with satisfactory proof of that person's service in the Arkansas National Guard or in the armed forces reserve; and

For the years of service credit granted, pays to the system the employee and employer contributions based on the greater of:

The annual salary received by the member for the member's first full year of credited service that precedes the fiscal year in which the service is purchased; or

The average of the three (3) highest annual salaries earned at the time of purchase.

The member shall pay interest from the end of that year of credited service to the date of payment in full.

Payment for service under this section shall be based on the contribution rates in effect at the time of the purchase.

The payment shall be credited to the member's deposit account and is in addition to any regular member contributions.

A member shall receive one (1) year of purchased service credit for every one (1) year of compensated service in the Arkansas National Guard or in the armed forces reserve.

The service in the Arkansas National Guard or in the armed forces reserve shall not become credited service under this system until the member:

Pays for the purchased service in the Arkansas National Guard or in the armed forces reserve.

Service may be purchased under this subdivision (d)(1) in one-month increments; and

Has established five (5) or more years of actual service in the system.

If a member ceases to be an active member before the service in the Arkansas National Guard or in the armed forces reserve has been established as system-credited service, the member payments contributed under this section are refundable, together with regular interest.

This section is supplemental to § 24-2-502, and nothing in this section shall diminish the right of any member of the system to obtain credited service in the system for active duty military service within the limits permitted by § 24-2-502.

However, no member is entitled to receive more than five (5) years of credited service rendered by the member under this section.

No member is eligible to purchase service credit in more than one (1) retirement system, whether federally or state-supported, for service time in the Arkansas National Guard or in the armed forces reserve.

Service credit in the system for active duty military service under § 24-2-502 and for service in the Arkansas National Guard or in the armed forces reserve shall not be given for the same period of time.

A member's service in the Arkansas National Guard or armed forces reserve shall not make the member eligible for any kind of benefit under any other state-supported retirement system except Social Security.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1027, § 1; 2007, No. 176, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 295, § 2; 2011, No. 38, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “five (5) years” for “one (1) year” in (b)(1); substituted “one (1) year” for “five (5) years” in (c); in (f), substituted “five (5)” for “three (3)” in (f)(2), substituted “retirement system, whether federally or state-supported” for “state-supported retirement system” in (f)(3), and substituted “state-supported retirement system” for “retirement system, including federal systems” in (f)(5); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment
inserted the (A) designation in (d)(1); in (d)(1)(A), substituted “purchased” for “year of” and deleted “at one (1) time in a single lump-sum payment”; and added (d)(1)(B).

24-2-504. Return to covered employment by military personnel.

An active member of the state retirement system who is called to active military duty or state active military duty shall be afforded all employment protections as provided in the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. § 4301 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2009.

Employer contributions shall be paid for the state retirement system member's period of active military duty by the member's last retirement system employer immediately before the member's active duty in accordance with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, as in effect on January 1, 2009.

In order to receive retirement credit in the state retirement system for the time spent in active duty, a member covered by the contributory provisions of the member's state retirement system who returns from active military duty to either the same or a different covered employer shall pay into the state retirement system the employee contributions that would have otherwise been paid into the state retirement system by the member as though the member had never left covered service.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 295, § 3; 2019, No. 474, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or state active military duty” in (a).

24-2-505. Compliance with Heroes Earnings Assistance and Relief Tax Act of 2008.

In the case of a member who dies while performing qualified military service, including state active military duty, on or after January 1, 2011, and who otherwise would have been entitled to reemployment rights under the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. § 4301 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2011, the survivors of that member are entitled to any additional benefits that would have been provided under the public employee retirement plan had the member resumed employment with a covered employer on the day preceding his or her death and then terminated employment on the actual date of death.

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not apply to benefit accruals relating to the period of qualified military service.

The member's qualified military service shall be counted for purposes of determining whether the individual in issue was vested with the public employee retirement plan.

In the case of a member who becomes disabled while performing qualified military service, including state active military duty, on or after January 1, 2011, and who otherwise would have been entitled to reemployment rights under the federal Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. § 4301 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2011, that member is considered to have resumed employment with a covered employer on the day preceding the onset of his or her disability and then terminated employment on the actual date he or she became disabled.

A member who dies or becomes disabled while performing qualified military service, including state active military duty, is deemed to have made employee contributions for the purpose of determining benefits other than benefit accruals that are contingent on those contributions for the period of qualified military service.

This section applies to each public retirement system unless the system has a specific provision regarding the Heroes Earnings Assistance and Relief Tax Act of 2008, Pub. L. No. 110-245, already in its law.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 5; 2019, No. 474, §§ 2, 3.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “including state active military duty” in the introductory language of (a)(1), and in (b) and (c).

Subchapter 6
— State Retirement Systems Investments

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 304, § 2: Mar. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the boards of trustees of the state retirement systems are bound to invest and manage trust assets under the Prudent Investor Rule, exercising reasonable care, skill, and caution when making investment and management decisions; that each contract to invest and manage system assets is intensely reviewed for favorable terms and executed to provide optimal return on the investment, keeping fees and other expenses to a minimum; that contracts that utilize the highly specialized and competitive skills of investment advisors in the public, private, and real estate markets require expertise that is particular to each state retirement system for which they invest, advise, or manage funds; that contracts are traditionally negotiated for terms that may last for decades for the benefit of the particular state retirement system so that the structure of the investment to receive profit may be fully realized and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent any state retirement system from being unduly burdened and severely financially harmed if it is forced to renegotiate these contracts, exposing the state retirement system to higher fees that total in the millions of dollars. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-2-601. Investment authority and limitations generally.

All investments of the retirement systems covered by this subchapter shall be in strict compliance with the provisions of this subchapter.

The term “trust” as used in this subchapter refers to the following Arkansas retirement systems:

The State Police Retirement System;

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System; and

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

The term “trustees” as used in this subchapter refers to boards of trustees of the systems referenced in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-602. Investment authority and limitations — Permissible investments.

The boards of trustees of the State Police Retirement System, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, and the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall have full power to invest and reinvest the moneys of the respective systems and to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any of the investments so made as well as the proceeds of the investments and moneys.

However, the investments and reinvestments shall only be made in accordance with the prudent investor rule set forth in §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-603. Investment authority and limitations — Default setoff.

In the event of default in payment of the principal or interest of any investment obligation held by any state retirement system where the issuer of the obligation receives moneys from the state, the default shall be certified by the board of the respective system to the Treasurer of State.

The Treasurer of State shall withhold all moneys due the issuer from the state until the default, together with regular interest thereon, is satisfied.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-604. Investment authority and limitations — Conflict of interest.

Except as to the rights of a member, retirant, or beneficiary, no trustee and no officer or employee of the board of any state retirement system shall have any interest, directly or indirectly, in the gains or profits of any investment made by the respective board. Nor shall any retirement system trustee, officer, or employee, directly or indirectly for himself or herself or as an agent, in any manner use the assets of the systems except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the respective boards, nor shall any of them become an endorser or surety or, in any manner, an obligor for moneys loaned by or borrowed from any of the respective systems.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-605. Investment authority and limitations — Fidelity bonds.

The boards of trustees of the respective retirement systems shall provide for a blanket fidelity bond of one million dollars ($1,000,000) covering the employees of the systems or such others as may be responsible for administering the funds.

The boards may pay the premiums for the bond from funds of the systems.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-606. Investment authority and limitations — Custodianship of assets.

The Treasurer of State shall be the legal custodian of the securities of the respective retirement systems. However, the systems may deposit with the Treasurer of State, in lieu of securities, safekeeping receipts or evidence of federal bookkeeping entries.

The financial institution or depository issuing the safekeeping receipts, unless issued by an agency of the federal government, shall have on file with the Treasurer of State a letter of the issuer's bonding or insurance company, stating the amount of insurance currently in force covering loss or theft of the securities.

In addition, the boards of trustees of the respective retirement systems, if deemed necessary to facilitate particular investment transactions, the settlement of security transactions, redemption of particular securities, or collection of investment income, may select and designate such banks, trust companies, or central depositories as may be appropriate to act as legal custodian of their securities.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-607. Investment authority and limitations — Trust account.

In addition to the various retirement systems funds established as trust funds in the State Treasury, a bank trust fund or funds may be established and maintained in such depository bank or banks as may be designated by the boards of trustees of the respective retirement systems.

Each bank fund shall consist of and there may be deposited in the fund:

All employer contributions, including any interest;

All employee contributions, including any interest;

Interest, dividend, and other incomes realized from investments and reinvestments;

Interest earned upon any moneys in the fund; and

Such other proceeds as may be derived from the sale, exchange, redemption, transfer, or disposition of any securities or investments.

The following disbursements may be made from the bank funds:

Payments for all securities and investments, the purchase of which is authorized by law, which may include principal, accrued interest, commission, taxes, and fees;

Payments for money manager and custodian bank fees;

The deposit to the appropriate State Treasury fund for the payment of annuities and refunds as authorized by law that are paid on vouchers issued by the respective retirement systems and on warrants issued thereon by the Auditor of State;

The payment of annuities and refunds as authorized by law that are paid on cash fund vouchers issued by the respective retirement systems and on checks or wire transfers issued from bank funds; and

The deposit to the appropriate State Treasury fund for the payments of salaries, maintenance, and operating expenses of the retirement systems supported from investment earnings.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-608. Investment authority and limitations — Arkansas-related investments.

In acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling, and managing funds held by each of the trusts, fiduciaries administering the systems shall manage the funds so as to favorably impact the economic condition of and maximize capital investment in the State of Arkansas when appropriate investment alternatives are available.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that, as assets become available for investment, the systems shall seek to invest not less than five percent (5%) nor more than ten percent (10%) of their portfolios in Arkansas-related investments.

In calculating the percentage of Arkansas-related investments, the systems shall not include Federal National Mortgage Association investments nor Government National Mortgage Association investments.

Nothing in this section shall in any way limit or impair the responsibility of a fiduciary to invest in accordance with the prudent investor rule set forth in §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-609. Registration of securities in name of nominee — Powers and duties of nominee.

The boards of trustees of the various state retirement systems are authorized to register stocks, bonds, notes, and other securities held by and for the systems in the name of a designated nominee.

Such action as is necessary to establish a nominee and a nominee agreement may be taken.

The nominee agreement shall specify that the nominee shall not have or claim any beneficial interest whatsoever in any stocks, bonds, notes, and other securities held in the name of the nominee. That is, all beneficial interest in the stocks, bonds, notes, and other securities and in the interest, dividends, and capital gains derived therefrom shall be vested in the respective state retirement systems.

The nominee shall have no power to undertake any obligation on behalf of the nominee, except upon the direction of the particular state retirement system.

The nominee may endorse securities and take other necessary actions in the purchase, registration, and sale of stocks, bonds, notes, and other securities, subject always to the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-610. Prudent investor rule.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, trustees who invest and manage trust assets owe a duty to the beneficiaries of the trust to comply with the prudent investor rule set forth in §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619.

The prudent investor rule, a default rule, may be expanded, restricted, eliminated, or otherwise altered by the provisions of a trust.

Trustees are not liable to a beneficiary to the extent that the trustees acted in reasonable reliance on the provisions of the trust.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-611. Standard of care — Portfolio strategy — Risk and return objectives.

Trustees shall invest and manage trust assets as a prudent investor would, by considering the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustees shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution.

The trustees' investment and management decisions respecting individual assets must be evaluated not in isolation but in the context of the trust portfolio as a whole and as a part of an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the trust.

Among circumstances that trustees shall consider in investing and managing trust assets are such of the following as are relevant to the trust or its beneficiaries:

General economic conditions;

The possible effect of inflation or deflation;

The expected tax consequences of investment decisions or strategies;

The role that each investment or course of action plays within the overall trust portfolio, which may include financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property, and real property;

The expected total return from income and the appreciation of capital;

Other resources of the beneficiaries;

Needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation or appreciation of capital; and

An asset's special relationship or special value, if any, to the purposes of the trust or to one (1) or more of the beneficiaries.

Trustees shall make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the investment and management of trust assets.

Trustees may invest in any kind of property or type of investment consistent with the standards of this subchapter.

Trustees who have special skills or expertise, or who are named trustees in reliance upon the trustees' representation that the trustees have special skills or expertise, have a duty to use their special skills or expertise.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-612. Diversification.

Trustees shall diversify the investments of the trust unless the trustees reasonably determine that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the trust are better served without diversifying.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-613. Duties at inception of trusteeship.

Within a reasonable time after accepting a trusteeship or receiving trust assets, trustees shall review the trust assets and make and implement decisions concerning the retention and disposition of assets in order to bring the trust portfolio into compliance with the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust and with the requirements of this subchapter.

Trustees shall develop an investment policy. This policy shall be a written statement of goals for the fund and rules to be followed to achieve those goals.

Trustees shall measure performance of the fund and shall measure each manager's performance against benchmarks jointly agreed upon by the trustees and managers.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-614. Loyalty.

Trustees shall invest and manage the trust assets solely in the interest of the members and benefit recipients of the trust.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-615. Impartiality.

If a trust has two (2) or more beneficiaries, the trustees shall act impartially in investing and managing the trust assets, taking into account any differing interests of the beneficiaries.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-616. Investment costs — Limitations on investment authority.

In investing and managing trust assets, trustees may only incur costs that are appropriate and reasonable in relation to the assets, the purposes of the trust, and the skills of the trustee.

Trustees may delegate investment functions to an agent that a prudent trustee of comparable skills could properly delegate as provided in § 24-2-618.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

24-2-617. Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with the prudent investor rule is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of the trustees' decisions or actions and is not determined by hindsight.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

Publisher's Notes.

The prudent investor rule, referred to in this section, is codified as §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619.